Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1943.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13001 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 12803 Page 1

A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Plain Writing Act of 2025".
B. As used in this act:
1. "Agency" means any state board, bureau, commission,
department, authority, public trust, interstate commission, the
Judiciary, the Legislature, and the Office of the Governor;
2. "Covered document" means any document that:
a. is necessary for obtaining any state government
benefit or service or filing taxes,
b. provides information about any state government
benefit or service, or
c. explains to the public how to comply with a
requirement this state administers or enforces.
The term also includes, whether in paper or electronic form, a
letter, publication, form, notice, or instruction, and does not
include a regulation; and
3. "Plain writing" means writing that is clear, concise, well-
organized, and follows other best practices appropriate to the
subject or field and intended audience.
C. Not later than nine (9) months after the effective date of
this act, the head of each agency shall:
1. Designate one or more senior officials within the agency to
oversee the agency implementation of this act;

Req. No. 12803 Page 2

2. Communicate the requirements of this act to the employees of
the agency;
3. Train employees of the agency in plain writing;
4. Establish a process for overseeing the ongoing compliance of
the agency with the requirements of this act;
5. Create and maintain a plain writing section on the website
of the agency as required under subsection D of this section that
is accessible from the homepage on the website of the agency; and
6. Designate one or more agency points-of-contact to receive
and respond to public input on:
a. agency implementation of this act, and
b. the agency reports required under subsection G of this
section.
D. The plain writing section described under paragraph 5 of
subsection C of this section shall:
1. Inform the public of agency compliance with the requirements
of this act; and
2. Provide a mechanism for the agency to receive and respond to
public input on:
a. agency implementation of this act, and
b. the agency reports required under subsection G of this
section.
E. Beginning not later than one (1) year after the effective
date of this act, each agency shall use plain writing in every
Req. No. 12803 Page 3

cove red document of the agency that the agency issues or
substantially revises.
F. 1. Not later than six (6) months after the effective date
of this act, the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services shall develop and issue guidance on implementing the
requirements of this section. The Director may designate a lead
agency, and may use interagency working groups to assist in
developing and issuing the guidance.
2. Before the issuance of guidance under paragraph 1 of this
subsection, agencies may follow the guidance of:
a. the writing guidelines developed by the Plain Language
Action and Information Network, a division of the
United States General Services Administration, or
b. guidance provided by the head of the agency that is
consistent with the guidelines referred to in
subparagraph a of this paragraph.
G. 1. Not later than nine (9) months after the effective date
of this act, the head of each agency shall publish on the plain
writing section of the website of the agency a report that describes
the agency plan for compliance with the requirements of this act.
2. Not later than eighteen (18) months after the effective date
of this act, and annually thereafter, the head of each agency shall
publish on the plain writing section of the website of the agency a
report on agency compliance with the requirements of this act.
Req. No. 12803 Page 4

H. There shall be no judicial review of compliance or
noncompliance with any provision of this act.
I. No provision of this act shall be construed to create any
right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable by any
administrative or judicial action.
J. If any entity subject to the provisions of this act violates
the requirements of the act, the entity shall pay an administrative
penalty of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for a first violation and
One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each second and subsequent
violation. Proceeds from each penalty shall be transferred to the
Oklahoma Indigent Defense System.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12803 MAH 02/20/25










Req. No. 12803 Page 5